Utah statutes.
31A-23a-803.   Books and records -- Reinsurance intermediary-broker.
(1)  For at least 10 years after expiration of each contract of reinsurance
transacted by the reinsurance intermediary-broker, he will keep a complete
record for each transaction showing:
(a)  the type of contract, limits, underwriting restrictions, classes or
risks, and territory;
(b)  the period of coverage, including the effective and expiration dates,
cancellation provisions, and notice required of cancellation;
(c)  reporting and settlement requirements of balances;
(d)  the rate used to compute the reinsurance premium;
(e)  the names and addresses of assuming reinsurers;
(f)  the rates of all reinsurance commissions, including the commissions on
any retrocessions handled by the reinsurance intermediary-broker;
(g)  related correspondence and memoranda;
(h)  proof of placement;
(i)  details regarding retrocessions handled by the reinsurance intermediary-
broker, including the identity of retrocessionaires and percentage of each
contract assumed or ceded;
(j)  financial records including premium and loss accounts; and
(k)  when the reinsurance intermediary-broker procures a reinsurance contract
on behalf of a licensed ceding insurer:
(i)  directly from any assuming reinsurer, written evidence that the assuming
reinsurer has agreed to assume the risk; or
(ii)  if placed through a representative of the assuming reinsurer, other than
an employee, written evidence that the reinsurer has delegated binding
authority to the representative.
(2)  The insurer will have access and the right to copy and audit all accounts
and records maintained by the reinsurance intermediary-broker related to its
business in a form usable by the insurer.
